apertium-nci.nci.lexc
LEXICON V-TV-itta

%<v%>%<tv%>:a  BASE1 ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:a  BASE3 ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:     BASE2 ; 

LEXICON V-TV-tlāliā

%<v%>%<tv%>:iā  BASE1 ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:ī  BASE3 ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:ī   BASE2 ; 


LEXICON V-TV-tequipachoā

%<v%>%<tv%>:oā  BASE1 ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:o  BASE3 ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>:o   BASE2 ; 

LEXICON V-DV

%<v%>%<tv2%>:     BASE1 ; 
%<v%>%<tv2%>:     BASE2 ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Sujeto

! sg1: n-
! pl1: n-S-me / n-poss-S-huan

@P.Sa.Sg@%<s_sg1%>:@P.Sa.Sg@n%{i%}%>               Predicate ;
@P.Sa.Sg@%<s_sg2%>:@P.Sa.Sg@t%{i%}%>               Predicate ;
@P.Sa.Sg@%<s_sg3%>:@P.Sa.Sg@                       Predicate ;
@P.Sa.Pl@%<s_pl1%>:@P.Sa.Pl@t%{i%}%>               Predicate ;
@P.Sa.Pl@%<s_pl2%>:@P.Sa.Pl@n%{i%}%>               Predicate ;
@P.Sa.Pl@%<s_pl3%>:@P.Sa.Pl@                       Predicate ;
                                                   Predicate ;

LEXICON Predicate
! Después del sujeto viene o una posesivo o un nominal
                                                   Possession ; 
                                                   Nominals ; 
LEXICON Possession 

@P.Px.Sg@%<px1sg%>:@P.Px.Sg@n%{o%}%>               Nominals ;
@P.Px.Sg@%<px2sg%>:@P.Px.Sg@m%{o%}%>               Nominals ;
@P.Px.Sg@%<px3sg%>:@P.Px.Sg@ī%>                    Nominals ;
@P.Px.Pl@%<px1pl%>:@P.Px.Pl@t%{o%}%>               Nominals ;
@P.Px.Pl@%<px2pl%>:@P.Px.Pl@am%{o%}%>             Nominals ;
@P.Px.Pl@%<px3pl%>:@P.Px.Pl@im%>                   Nominals ;

LEXICON Nominals 
! Sustantivos, sustantivos relacionales y otras categorias que
! pueden llevar posesión
                                                   Nouns ; 
                                                   Relacionales ; 

LEXICON PlainPlural

@D.Px@@D.Sa@%<pl%>:@D.Px@@D.Sa@                # ; ! Las casas
@D.Px@@R.Sa.Pl@%<pl%>:@D.Px@@R.Sa.Pl@          # ; ! Ellos son las casas

LEXICON PossPlural

@R.Px.Pl@@D.Sa@%<pl%>:@R.Px.Pl@@D.Sa@          # ; ! Sus casas
@R.Px.Pl@@R.Sa.Pl@%<pl%>:@R.Px.Pl@@R.Sa.Pl@    # ; ! Ellos son sus casas

LEXICON Plural 
:%>huan                                              PossPlural ;
:%>me                                                PlainPlural ;

LEXICON Locativo

%<loc%>:%>c%{o%}                                   # ;

LEXICON Diminutivo

%<dim%>:%>tzin                                     # ; 
%<dim%>:%>tzin                                     Locativo ; 
@D.Px@%<dim%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@%>tzin%>tli             # ;  ! FIXME: Comprobar análisis ! Comprobar si se puede tener posesivo
%<dim%>%<pl%>:%>tzi%>tzin                          # ;  ! FIXME: Comprobar análisis
%<dim%>:%>tzi%>tzin                                PossPlural ;  ! FIXME: Comprobar análisis

                                                   Diminutivo2 ; 

LEXICON Diminutivo2
!-tontli	-toːntɬi	_	smallness (a compounding element that must be bound to another element; see Karttunen); this is the singular ending; the plural would be -totontin (see Carochi; see also our entry for -ton.)¶

%<dim2%>:%>ton                                     # ; 
%<dim2%>:%>ton                                     Locativo ; 
@D.Px@%<dim2%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@%>ton%>tli             # ;  ! FIXME: Comprobar análisis ! Comprobar si se puede tener posesivo
%<dim2%>%<pl%>:%>to%>tontin                          # ;  ! FIXME: Comprobar análisis
%<dim2%>:%>to%>tontin                                PossPlural ;  ! FIXME: Comprobar análisis
%<dim2%>:%>to%>tontin                                PossPlural ;  ! FIXME: Comprobar análisis



LEXICON Deriv 
                                                   Diminutivo ; 
                                                   Locativo ; 
%<cmp%>%+:%>                                       Relacionales ;

LEXICON N-PLUR-REDUP

%<n%>: PlainPlural ; 
%<n%>:%>huan PossPlural ; 

LEXICON N-ATL
! <s_pl3><px3sg>tipoztl<n> <-- BAD

@D.Px@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@%>tl                      # ;
%<n%>:                                             # ;
%<n%>:                                             Plural ;
%<n%>:                                             Deriv ;

LEXICON N-CAXITL

@D.Px@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@%>itl                     # ;
%<n%>:                                             # ;
%<n%>:                                             Plural ;
%<n%>:                                             Deriv ;

LEXICON N-MIQUIZTLI
! TODO: Derivados de verbo
@D.Px@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@%>tli                     # ;
%<n%>:                                             # ;
%<n%>:                                             Plural ;
%<n%>:                                             Deriv ;

LEXICON N-PAHTLI

@D.Px@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@%>tli                     # ;
%<n%>:                                             # ;
%<n%>:                                             Plural ;
%<n%>:                                             Deriv ;

LEXICON N-TEŌPANTLI
! TODO: locativo en -pan, i no en -panco
@D.Px@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@%>tli                     # ;
%<n%>:                                             # ;
%<n%>:                                             Plural ;
%<n%>:                                             Deriv ;


LEXICON N-CALLI

@D.Px@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@%>li                      # ;
%<n%>:                                             # ;
%<n%>:%>li                                         Plural ;
%<n%>:                                             Deriv ;

LEXICON N-NOCHI

@D.Px@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@%>i                       # ;
%<n%>:                                             # ;
%<n%>:%>tin                                        PlainPlural ;
%<n%>:                                             Deriv ;


LEXICON N-CHAPOLIN

@D.Px@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@%>in                      # ;
%<n%>:                                             # ;
%<n%>:%>tin                                        PlainPlural ;
%<n%>:                                             Deriv ;

LEXICON N-TLĀCATL

@D.Px@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@%>tl                      # ;
%<n%>:                                             # ;
%<n%>:%>h                                          PlainPlural ;
%<n%>:                                             Deriv ;

LEXICON N-CUALLI

@D.Px@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@%>li                      # ;
%<n%>:                                             # ;
%<n%>:%>tin                                        PlainPlural ;
%<n%>:                                             Deriv ;


LEXICON N-AYOTOCHIN

@D.Px@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@%>in                      # ;
%<n%>:                                             # ;
%<n%>:                                             Plural ;
%<n%>:                                             Deriv ;

LEXICON N-PATOX

@D.Px@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@                          # ;
%<n%>:                                             # ;
%<n%>:                                             Plural ;
%<n%>:                                             Deriv ;

LEXICON N-TZONTECON 
! <s_pl3><px3sg>tipoztl<n> <-- BAD

@D.Px@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@%>                        # ;
%<n%>:                                             # ;
%<n%>:                                             Deriv ;

LEXICON N-TEŌPIXQUI

@D.Px@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@                          # ;
%<n%>:                                             # ;
%<n%>:                                             Plural ;
%<n%>:                                             Deriv ;

LEXICON N-HUĒY

@D.Px@%<n%>%<abs%>:@D.Px@                          # ;
%<n%>:                                             # ;
%<n%>:                                             Plural ;
%<n%>:                                             Deriv ;


LEXICON NP-MALINTZIN

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<dim%>: # ; 

LEXICON NP-NEZAHUALCOYOTL

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: Diminutivo ; 

LEXICON NP-SANCHEZ

%<np%>%<cog%>: # ; 

LEXICON NP-JUAN

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: # ; 

LEXICON NP-TENOCHTITLAN

%<np%>%<top%>: # ; 

LEXICON Nouns
tōchtli:tō%>tōch%>tin                           N-PLUR-REDUP ; ! "conejos"
teōpantli:teōpan                                N-TEŌPANTLI ; ! "iglesia"
tēcpantli:tēcpan                                N-TEŌPANTLI ; ! "palacio"
miquiztli:miquiz                                N-MIQUIZTLI ; ! "muerte"
mīlli:mīl                                       N-CALLI ; ! "campo"
tamazolin:tamazol                               N-AYOTOCHIN ; ! "rana"
ayotochin:ayotoch                               N-AYOTOCHIN ; ! "armadillo"
patox:patox                                     N-PATOX ; ! "pato"
chichi:chichi                                   N-PATOX ; ! "perro"
xihuitl:xi%{u%}%{h%}                            N-CAXITL ; ! "hierba, año"
teōxihuitl:teōxi%{u%}%{h%}                      N-CAXITL ; ! "hierba, año"
cuahuitl:cua%{u%}%{h%}                          N-CAXITL ; ! "árbol"
cemilhuitl:cemil%{u%}%{h%}                      N-CAXITL ; ! "un día"
caxitl:cax                                      N-CAXITL ; ! "copa"
tequitl:tequ                                    N-CAXITL ; ! "trabajo, obra, cargo"
xōchitl:xōch                                    N-CAXITL ; ! "flor"
michin:mich                                     N-CHAPOLIN ; ! "pescado"
citlālin:citlāl                                 N-CHAPOLIN ; ! "estrella"
citlālin:ci%>citlāl%>tin                        N-PLUR-REDUP ; ! "estrellas"
chapolin:chapol                                 N-CHAPOLIN ; ! "chapulín"
chapolin:chā%>chapol%>tin                       N-PLUR-REDUP ; ! "chapulín"
cihuātl:cihuā                                   N-TLĀCATL ;
mexicatl:mexica                                 N-TLĀCATL ;
otomitl:otomi                                   N-TLĀCATL ;
tzontecomatl:tzontecoma                         N-TLĀCATL ;
pitzōnacatl:pitzōnaca                           N-TLĀCATL ; ! "carne de puerco"
pochtēcatl:pochtēca                             N-TLĀCATL ; ! "pochteca, vendedor"
tlahtoāni:tlahtohuani                           N-TZONTECON ; ! "rey, líder" ! FIXME: Comprobar
tōnatiuh:tōnatiuh                               N-TZONTECON ; ! "sol"
teōpixqui:teōpixqui                             N-TEŌPIXQUI ; ! "sacerdote"
cemānāhuac:cemānāhuac                           N-TZONTECON ; ! "universo, mundo"
chīcyōtl:chīcyō    N-ATL ; ! "brujería"
conētl:cocone    N-PLUR-REDUP ; ! ""
nexātl:nexā    N-ATL ; ! ""
tomitl:tomi    N-ATL ; ! "sheep's wool"
ānāhuatl:ānāhua N-ATL ; ! "round disc"
cuezcomatl:cuezcoma N-ATL ; ! "granary"
māchoncotl:māchonco N-ATL ; ! "an upper-arm bracelet or bangle"
tetl:te N-ATL ; ! "_"
tlacōtl:tlacō N-ATL ; ! "a stick"
tlaxcalli:tlaxcal N-CALLI ; ! "tortilla or baked bread "
yohualli:yohual N-CUALLI ; ! "nighttime"
tlapalli²:tlapal N-CUALLI ; ! "force"
texcalli:texcal N-CALLI ; ! "stone"
xiuhchimalli:xiuhchimal N-CUALLI ; ! "a war shield decorated with turquoise stones"
tlayohualli:tlayohual N-CUALLI ; ! "the darkness of night"
cacalli:cacal N-CALLI ; ! "a crow or a raven "
xīcalli:xīcal N-CALLI ; ! "gourd vessel "
tlayelli:tlayel N-CUALLI ; ! "something foul"
tlahuīcalli:tlahuīcal N-CALLI ; ! "_"
tēicnēlīlli:tēicnēlīl N-CUALLI ; ! "a good deed done to another person"
huapalcalli:huapalcal N-CALLI ; ! "a store or a house of planks "
cuauhtli:cuauh N-PAHTLI ; ! "eagle"
tzītzicāztli:tzītzicāz N-PAHTLI ; ! "nettle"
tlāltepoztli:tlāltepoz N-PAHTLI ; ! "a hoe or plow "
chicāhualiztli:chicāhualiz N-PAHTLI ; ! "strength"
tlapantli:tlapan N-PAHTLI ; ! "a flat roof "
quēnamicātzintli:quēnamicātzin N-PAHTLI ; ! "a respectful greeting"
amapatlachtli:amapatlach N-PAHTLI ; ! "pieces of paper with feathers attached using colored threads "
huēy:huēy N-HUĒY ; ! "big, great" ! ce huey xonacatl	1 cebolla grande
huēyi:huēyi N-HUĒY ; ! "big great" ! hueyi in tlacualchihualoyan	la cocina es grande
huēyi:huehuēyi N-PLUR-REDUP ; ! 
mahuiztic:mahuiztic N-HUĒY ; ! "admirable"
melahuac:melahuac N-TZONTECON ; ! "algo recto"
taximetro:taximetro N-TZONTECON ; ! ""
nochi:nochi N-TZONTECON ; ! "todo" ! FIXME: Comprobar
nochi:noch N-NOCHI ; ! "todo" ! FIXME: Comprobar
